Washington statutes.
RCW 43.03.150

Advance payment of travel expenses—Authorized.

Whenever it becomes necessary for an elective or appointive official or employee of the state to travel and to incur expenses for which reimbursement may be made, it shall be the policy of the state to make reasonable allowances to such officers and employees in advance of expenditure, on request of such officer or employee, under appropriate rules and regulations prescribed by the director of financial management.

[ 1979 c 151 s 87; 1967 ex.s. c 16 s 6.]